Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.070

Oath and powers of commissioner.

The person to whom such commission shall be directed, if he or she reside within the state and accept the trust, shall, before entering upon the execution of his or her duties, take the oath of office prescribed in the Constitution. Such commissioner shall have power to issue process to compel the attendance of witnesses, whom he or she shall be required to examine, and shall have power to administer oaths to such witnesses.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6006; 1895 c 6 s 6; RRS s 8183.]